Hawaii, session 2025, GM1306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. Section 302L-1.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
3 "(b) The board shall consist of the following voting
4 members:
5 (1) One voting member from the county of Hawaii;
6 (2) One voting member from the county of Maui;
7 (3) One voting member from the county of Kauai;
8 (4) Three voting members from the city and county of
9 Honolulu; and
10 (5) Three at-large voting members[—]£
11 provided that one voting member shall have experience as a local
12 provider of early childhood education and development services.
13 The superintendent of education, director of human
14 services, director of health, [aftd] president of the
15 [University] university of Hawaii, and director of the Hawaii
16 head start state collaboration office shall serve as ex officio,
17 nonvoting members of the board.
2025-2678 SB423 CDl SMA-l.docx
iMiiniiiiiiiMniHiiBiiaii

Page 2 S.B. NO. "
i
C.D. 1
1 The board shall invite the chief executive officer of
2 Kamehameha Schools the executive director of the Hawaii
3 Association of Independent Schools, and president of the Head
4 Start Association of Hawaii, or their designees, to serve as ex
5 officio, [non-voting] nonvoting members of the board."
6 SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
7 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
8 SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2678 SB423 CDl SMA-l.docx 2

S.B. NO.
ocb
:□o
Ob
APPROVED this 24th day of June . 2025
ACTING GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 423, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
V
'resioenTOi the senate
Clerk of the Senate
73

SB No. 423, SD 1,HD2,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives